Washington statutes.
RCW 10.29.060

Disclosures by witness—Penalty.

Any witness who shall disclose the fact that he or she has been called as a witness before a statewide special inquiry judge or who shall disclose the nature of the testimony given shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1980 c 146 s 6.]